Maryland, session 2025, HB0790.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
2–112.
– 1 –

Ch. 108 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Homeowner” has the meaning stated in § 9–105 of this article.
(3) “Tax” has the meaning stated in § 14–801 of this article.
(b) There is a State Tax Sale Ombudsman in the Department.
(d) The Ombudsman shall:
(1) assist homeowners to understand the process for collection of
delinquent taxes;
(2) actively assist homeowners to apply for tax credits, discount programs,
and other public benefits that may assist the homeowners to pay delinquent taxes and
improve their financial situation;
(3) refer homeowners to legal services, housing counseling, and other social
services that may assist homeowners to pay delinquent taxes and improve their financial
situation;
(4) maintain a website that:
(I) functions as a clearinghouse for information concerning:
[(i)] 1. the process for collection of delinquent taxes; and
[(ii)] 2. services and programs that are available to assist
homeowners to pay delinquent taxes and improve their financial situation; and
(II) INCLUDES:
1. THE STATEMENT “IF YOU WOULD LIKE TO PAY YOUR
PROPERTY TAXES IN MONTHLY INSTALLMENTS, YOU MAY BE ELIGIBLE TO ENROLL
IN AN INSTALLMENT PAYMENT PLAN.”;
2. A COMPLETE DESCRIPTION OF THE INSTALLMENT
PAYMENT PROGRAM UNDER SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION; AND
3. DETAILED INSTRUCTIONS ON HOW TO ENROLL IN THE
INSTALLMENT PAYMENT PROGRAM UNDER SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(5) maintain a toll–free telephone number that a homeowner may call to
obtain individualized personal assistance with delinquent taxes.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 108
(f) (1) The Ombudsman shall contract with a vendor to operate an installment
payment program for the payment of taxes in which any homeowner may enroll.
(2) The installment payment program shall allow a homeowner to:
(i) make advance payments of taxes;
(ii) make payments of taxes currently due; or
(iii) make payments of taxes in arrears.
(3) (i) A homeowner whose dwelling is subject to a deed of trust, a
mortgage, or any other encumbrance that includes the escrowing of tax payments may not
enroll in the installment payment program for the advance payment of taxes.
(ii) An advance payment of taxes is calculated by applying the
current property tax rate to the assessment of the homeowner’s property for the prior year.
(iii) If the advance payment is different than the taxes due as finally
determined, the vendor shall:
1. bill the homeowner for the unpaid balance; or
2. refund any excess tax paid.
(iv) The failure by a homeowner to make an advance payment under
the installment payment program may not be considered to be a failure to pay the property
tax when due except as provided under Title 10, Subtitle 1 of this article.
(4) The Ombudsman shall notify the collector to whom the taxes are owed
when a homeowner enters into an installment payment plan under this subsection.
(5) If a homeowner is in compliance with the terms of an installment
payment plan, the collector may not take action under Title 14, Subtitle 8 of this article to
collect any property taxes in arrears that are included in the installment payment plan.
(6) A homeowner is not in compliance with the terms of an installment
payment plan if the homeowner fails to make a payment for a period of 90 days after the
date the payment is due, or a longer period determined by the Ombudsman.
(7) If a homeowner is not in compliance with the terms of an installment
payment plan:
(i) the Ombudsman:
1. may terminate the installment payment plan; and
– 3 –

Ch. 108 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
2. shall notify the collector to whom the taxes are owed; and
(ii) the collector may take action under Title 14, Subtitle 8 of this
article to collect any property taxes in arrears that were included in the installment
payment plan.
(8) The cost of the contract with the vendor to operate the installment
payment program shall be paid entirely by reasonable fees imposed on homeowners
enrolled in the program.
4–201.2.
(A) EACH COLLECTOR SHALL INCLUDE WITH EACH PROPERTY TAX BILL A
SEPARATE INSERT THAT INCLUDES:
(1) THE STATEMENT “IF YOU WOULD LIKE TO PAY YOUR PROPERTY
TAXES IN MONTHLY INSTALLMENTS, YOU MAY BE ELIGIBLE TO ENROLL IN AN
INSTALLMENT PAYMENT PLAN.”;
(2) A CONCISE DESCRIPTION OF THE PROGRAM UNDER § 2–112(F) OF
THIS ARTICLE OR ANY LOCAL INSTALLMENT PAYMENT PROGRAM FOR PROPERTY
TAXES UNDER § 10–208 OR § 10–209 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(3) INSTRUCTIONS ON HOW TO ENROLL IN THE PROGRAM UNDER §
2–112(F) OF THIS ARTICLE OR ANY LOCAL INSTALLMENT PAYMENT PROGRAM FOR
PROPERTY TAXES UNDER § 10–208 OR § 10–209 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(B) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
THE STATE TAX SALE OMBUDSMAN SHALL DESIGN THE SEPARATE INSERT
REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION AND PROVIDE THE INSERT TO
EACH COLLECTOR.
(2) THE COLLECTOR SHALL DESIGN THE SEPARATE INSERT
REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION IF THE INSERT INCLUDES
INFORMATION ON A LOCAL INSTALLMENT PAYMENT PROGRAM FOR PROPERTY
TAXES UNDER § 10–208 OR § 10–209 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(C) EACH COLLECTOR THAT MAINTAINS A WEBSITE SHALL INCLUDE ON THE
COLLECTOR’S WEBSITE IN A CONSPICUOUS LOCATION THE SAME STATEMENT AND
THE SAME INFORMATION CONTAINED IN THE INSERT REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
10–208.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 108
(a) (1) Subject to § 10–205 of this subtitle, the governing body of a county or
municipal corporation may authorize, by law, an installment payment schedule for the
county, municipal corporation, or special taxing district property tax imposed on real
property.
(2) If a fee or other charge imposed by a county, municipal corporation, or
special taxing district is also included on the tax bill sent to the taxpayer, the governing
body of a county or municipal corporation may also authorize, by law, the payment of the
fee or charge through the installment payment schedule authorized under paragraph (1) of
this subsection.
(3) (i) Subject to § 10–205 of this subtitle, an installment payment
schedule authorized under this subsection may be scheduled in advance of the property tax
bill.
(ii) An installment payment schedule may include any number of
due dates scheduled:
1. on or after January 1; and
2. on or before the due date under § 10–102 of this title or §
10–204.3 of this subtitle, whichever is applicable.
(b) For any installment payment scheduled after July 1:
(1) the taxing authority may impose a service charge in accordance with §
10–204.3(f) and (g) of this subtitle; and
(2) no interest may be charged if payment is made before the next
installment is due or the last installment is due, whichever is earlier.
(c) The governing body of a county or municipal corporation that authorized an
installment payment schedule under § 10–205 of this subtitle may provide, by law, for:
(1) any additional eligibility criteria for an installment payment schedule
under this section;
(2) the process for electing an installment payment schedule;
(3) the number of installment payments allowed each year;
(4) the due date for each installment payment; and
(5) any other provision necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.
– 5 –

Ch. 108 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(d) (1) A taxpayer may elect to pay the property tax imposed on real property
through an installment payment schedule authorized under this section.
(2) The failure by the taxpayer to make an installment payment under an
installment payment schedule authorized under this section may not be considered to be a
failure to pay the property tax when due except as provided under Subtitle 1 of this title.
10–209.
(a) The Mayor and City Council of Baltimore City or the governing body of a
county or municipal corporation may, by law, establish an installment payment program
for taxes in arrears on any residential property.
(b) Any fee or charge of any kind that is included on a property tax bill may be
paid through the installment payment program authorized under subsection (a) of this
section.
(c) (1) If a person is in compliance with the terms of an installment payment
program under this section, the collector may not take action under Title 14, Subtitle 8 of
this article to collect any property taxes in arrears that are included in the installment
payment program.
(2) A person is not in compliance with the terms of an installment payment
program if the person fails to make a payment for a period of 90 days after the date the
payment is due, or a longer period determined by the Mayor and City Council of Baltimore
City or the governing body of a county or municipal corporation.
(3) If a person is not in compliance with the terms of an installment
payment program, the collector may:
(i) terminate the person’s enrollment in the installment payment
program; and
(ii) take action under Title 14, Subtitle 8 of this article to collect the
property taxes in arrears that were included in the installment payment program.
(d) The Mayor and City Council of Baltimore City or the governing body of a
county or municipal corporation may provide, by law, for:
(1) any additional eligibility criteria for an installment payment program
under this section;
(2) the process for enrolling in an installment payment program;
(3) the frequency and due dates of installment payments; and
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 108
(4) any other provision necessary to carry out this section.
14–812.
(a) (1) At least 30 days before any property is first advertised for sale under
this subtitle, the collector shall have mailed to the person who last appears as owner of the
property on the collector’s tax roll, at the last address shown on the tax roll, a statement
giving the name of the person, and the amounts of taxes due.
(2) On the statement required under paragraph (1) of this subsection there
shall also appear the following notice:
……………………………
“Date”
“This Is a Final Bill and Legal Notice to the Person Whose Name Appears on This
Notice.”
“According to the collector’s tax roll you are the owner of the property appearing on
this notice. Some of the taxes listed are in arrears. Notice is given you that unless all taxes
in arrears are paid on or before 30 days from the above date, the collector will proceed to
sell the above property to satisfy your entire indebtedness. Interest and penalties must be
added to the total at the time of payment.”
(3) In Baltimore City, the notice required under paragraph (1) of this
subsection shall include an itemized list of the source and amount of each tax due that the
collector seeks to recover through the tax sale.
(b) The mailing required under subsection (a) of this section shall include a
separate insert that includes the following:
(1) a clear, concise, and easily understandable summary of the tax sale
process not exceeding one page in length that includes a simple explanation of the steps
that a property owner is required to take to retain the property at each stage in the process;
(2) the statement “If this property is your principal residence and you are
having difficulty paying the taxes on the property, there are programs that may help you.”;
(3) a statement that the State Tax Sale Ombudsman established under §
2–112 of this article or the County Tax Sale Ombudsman, if applicable, is available to:
(i) answer questions about the tax sale process; and
(ii) assist homeowners with applying for tax credits and other
benefits that may help homeowners to pay delinquent taxes and retain their homes;
– 7 –

Ch. 108 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(4) the toll–free telephone number and website address of the State Tax
Sale Ombudsman or the County Tax Sale Ombudsman, if applicable;
(5) a statement that free counseling is available to help homeowners make
plans to pay their bills and keep their homes by calling the telephone number of:
(i) the Homeowner’s HOPE Hotline; or
(ii) another similar local housing counseling service chosen by the
collector;
(6) the following information concerning the homeowners’ property tax
credit under § 9–104 of this article:
(i) the statement “The homeowners’ property tax credit may
significantly reduce the property taxes you owe if you have limited income and assets. You
may be eligible for the credit at any age, but if you are 70 years old or older, you may be
eligible for a special benefit that may reduce the taxes you owe for the past 3 years.”; and
(ii) the website address and telephone number of the State Tax Sale
Ombudsman where more information is available about the homeowners’ property tax
credit and how to apply;
(7) if the collector uses the tax sale process to enforce a lien for unpaid
charges for water or sewer service and a water or sewer utility serving the collector’s
jurisdiction offers a program for discounted water or sewer rates for low–income customers:
(i) a brief description of the program for discounted water or sewer
rates for low–income customers; and
(ii) information on how to apply for the program, including, if
applicable, a website address and telephone number where more information and
applications are available;
(8) the following information concerning the Homeowner Protection
Program under Part VII of this subtitle:
(i) the statement, “If you are a homeowner of limited income you
may qualify for the Homeowner Protection Program, which could keep your home out of tax
sale for at least 3 years and could help you to pay the taxes you owe and keep your home.”;
and
(ii) the website address and telephone number of the State Tax Sale
Ombudsman where more information is available about the Homeowner Protection
Program and how to apply; [and]
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 108
(9) THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION CONCERNING INSTALLMENT
PAYMENT PROGRAMS FOR OVERDUE PROPERTY TAXES:
(I) THE STATEMENT “IF YOU WOULD LIKE TO PAY YOUR
OVERDUE PROPERTY TAXES IN MONTHLY INSTALLMENTS, YOU MAY BE ELIGIBLE TO
ENROLL IN AN INSTALLMENT PAYMENT PLAN.”;
(II) A CONCISE DESCRIPTION OF THE PROGRAM UNDER §
2–112(F) OF THIS ARTICLE OR ANY LOCAL INSTALLMENT PAYMENT PROGRAM FOR
OVERDUE PROPERTY TAXES UNDER § 10–209 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(III) INSTRUCTIONS ON HOW TO ENROLL IN THE PROGRAM
UNDER § 2–112(F) OF THIS ARTICLE OR ANY LOCAL INSTALLMENT PAYMENT
PROGRAM FOR OVERDUE PROPERTY TAXES UNDER § 10–209 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
[(9)] (10) any other information that may assist low–income homeowners
in avoiding tax sale costs or foreclosure that the collector considers appropriate.
14–817.1.
(c) The mailing required under this section shall include a separate insert that
includes all of the information required under § 14–812(b) of this subtitle.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025 May 1, 2027.
Approved by the Governor, April 22, 2025.
– 9 –